Utah statutes.
62A-15-623.   Criminal's escape -- Penalty.

Any person committed to the state hospital under the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 15, Inquiry into Sanity of Defendant, or Chapter 16, Mental Examination after Conviction, who escapes or leaves the state hospital without proper legal authority is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

